Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.340

Seizure and forfeiture—Remedies nondefeatable and supplemental.

(1) Any action taken by or on behalf of a convicted person including but not limited to executing a power of attorney or creating a corporation for the purpose of defeating the provisions of RCW 7.68.300 through 7.68.330 is null and void as against the public policy of this state.

(2) RCW 7.68.300 through 7.68.330 are supplemental and do not limit rights or remedies otherwise available to the victims of crimes and do not limit actions otherwise available against persons convicted of crimes.

[ 1993 c 288 s 7.]